Indiana, session 2026, HB1086.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-30-5-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.1-2005, SECTION
14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2026]: Sec. 3. (a) This section applies to the following writings,
documents, and records:
(1) The Constitution of the United States.
(2) The national motto.
(3) The national anthem.
(4) The Pledge of Allegiance.
(5) The Constitution of the State of Indiana.
(6) The Declaration of Independence.
(7) The Mayflower Compact.
(8) The Federalist Papers.
(9) "Common Sense" by Thomas Paine.
(10) The writings, speeches, documents, and proclamations of the
founding fathers and presidents of the United States.
(11) United States Supreme Court decisions.
(12) Executive orders of the presidents of the United States.
HB 1086—LS 6475/DI 143


(13) Frederick Douglas' Speech at Rochester, New York, on July
5, 1852, entitled "What to a Slave is the Fourth of July?".
(14) Appeal by David Walker.
(15) Chief Seattle's letter to the United States government in 1852
in response to the United States government's inquiry regarding
the purchase of tribal lands.
(16) The Ten Commandments.
(b) A school corporation may allow a principal or teacher in the
school corporation to read or post in a school building or classroom or
at a school event any excerpt or part of a writing, document, or record
listed in subsection (a), except that a principal or teacher may not
read the Ten Commandments aloud when students are present.
(c) A school corporation may not permit the content based
censorship of American history or heritage based on religious
references in a writing, document, or record listed in subsection (a).
(d) A library, a media center, or an equivalent facility that a school
corporation maintains for student use must contain in the facility's
permanent collection at least one (1) copy of each writing or document
listed in subsection (a)(1) through (a)(9) and subsection (a)(16).
(e) A school corporation:
(1) shall allow a student to include a reference to a writing,
document, or record listed in subsection (a) in a report or other
work product; and
(2) may not punish the student in any way, including a reduction
in grade, for using the reference.
HB 1086—LS 6475/DI 143


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Education, to which was referred
House Bill 1086, has had the same under consideration and begs leave
to report the same back to the House with the recommendation that said
bill be amended as follows:
Delete everything after the enacting clause and insert the following:
(SEE TEXT OF BILL)
and when so amended that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1086 as introduced.)
BEHNING
Committee Vote: yeas 8, nays 3.
HB 1086—LS 6475/DI 143